Utah statutes.
63G-6a-802.   Sole source -- Award of contract without competition -- Notice.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Transitional costs" mean the costs of changing from an existing provider of, or type of, a procurement item to another provider of, or type of, procurement item.

(b)  "Transitional costs" include:

(i)  training costs;

(ii)  conversion costs;

(iii)  compatibility costs;

(iv)  system downtime;

(v)  disruption of service;

(vi)  staff time necessary to put the transition into effect;

(vii)  installation costs; and

(viii)  ancillary software, hardware, equipment, or construction costs.

(c)  "Transitional costs" do not include:

(i)  the costs of preparing for or engaging in a procurement process; or

(ii)  contract negotiation or contract drafting costs.

(2)  The division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority may award a contract for a procurement item without competition if the procurement officer, the head of the procurement unit, or a designee of either who is senior to the procurement officer or the head of the procurement unit, determines in writing that:

(a)  there is only one source for the procurement item; or

(b)  the award to a specific supplier, service provider, or contractor is a condition of a donation that will fund the full cost of the supply, service, or construction item.

(3)  Circumstances under which there is only one source for a procurement item may include:

(a)  where the most important consideration in obtaining a procurement item is the compatibility of equipment, technology, software, accessories, replacement parts, or service;

(b)  where a procurement item is needed for trial use or testing;

(c)  where transitional costs are unreasonable or cost prohibitive; or

(d)  procurement of public utility services.

(4)  The applicable rulemaking authority shall make rules regarding the publication of notice for a sole source procurement that, at a minimum, require publication of notice of a sole source procurement, in accordance with Section 63G-6a-406, if the cost of the procurement exceeds $50,000.

(5) The division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority who awards a sole source contract on behalf of another procurement unit shall negotiate with the contractor to ensure that the terms of the contract, including price and delivery, are in the best interest of the procurement unit.

(6)  The division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority may extend a contract for a reasonable period of time without engaging in a standard procurement process, if:

(a)  the award of a new contract for the procurement item is delayed due to a protest or appeal;

(b)  the standard procurement process is delayed due to unintentional error;

(c)  changes in industry standards require significant changes to specifications for the procurement item;

(d)  the extension is necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds;

(e)  the extension is necessary to address a circumstance where the appropriation of state or federal funds has been delayed; or

(f)  the extension covers the period of time during which contract negotiations with a new provider are being conducted.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

